dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
bedel ödemek/≙
bitümlemek/≙
bölümlemek/≙
börtlemek/≙
büngüldemek/≙
bürümek/≙
bütünlemek/≙
büyüksemek/≙
büyülemek/≙
büyümek/≙
büyümsemek/≙
büzgülemek/≙
büğemek/≙
cücüklemek/≙
dökümlemek/≙
döllemek/≙
döngülemek/≙
dörtlemek/≙
döşemek/≙
düdüklemek/≙
dürtüklemek/≙
dürtüşlemek/≙
dürümlemek/≙
düzemek/≙
düzlemek/≙
düğümlemek/≙
düşlemek/≙
eşgüdümlemek/≙
göllemek/≙
gömülemek/≙
görüntülemek/≙
göynümek/≙
gözemek/≙
gözlemek/≙
göğnümek/≙
göğüslemek/≙
gücümsemek/≙
güdülemek/≙
güdümlemek/≙
gülümsemek/≙
gümbürdemek/≙
gümlemek/≙
gümrüklemek/≙
gümüşlemek/≙
günlemek/≙
günülemek/≙
gürlemek/≙
gürüldemek/≙
güzlemek/≙
hüngürdemek/≙
indüklemek/≙
kapsüllemek/≙
köhnemek/≙
köklemek/≙
köprülemek/≙
köpüklemek/≙
köpülemek/≙
körlemek/≙
körüklemek/≙
kösnümek/≙
kötülemek/≙
kötümsemek/≙
közlemek/≙
kükremek/≙
kükürtlemek/≙
küllemek/≙
küngüldemek/≙
küngürdemek/≙
küremek/≙
kürnemek/≙
kürümek/≙
kütlemek/≙
kütürdemek/≙
küçüklemek/≙
küçüksemek/≙
küçümsemek/≙
löklemek/≙
lömbürdemek/≙
löngürdemek/≙
lüplemek/≙
mühürlemek/≙
ney üflemek/≙
nötrlemek/≙
pörsümek/≙
pörtlemek/≙
püflemek/≙
pürüzlemek/≙
sansürlemek/≙
siyanürlemek/≙
su yürümek/≙
suç yüklemek/≙
sölpümek/≙
sönümlemek/≙
sövüşlemek/≙
söylemek/≙
sözlemek/≙
söğüşlemek/≙
südremek/≙
sülfürlemek/≙
sümek/≙⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
süngülemek/≙
sürdürümlemek/≙
sürgülemek/≙
sürüklemek/≙
sürümek/≙
süslemek/≙
süsleyip püslemek/≙
Tömek/≙⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
tömek/≙
törpülemek/≙
töslemek/≙
tükürüklemek/≙
tülemek/≙
tümlemek/≙
tünemek/≙
tüplemek/≙
türemek/≙
türkülemek/≙
tütsülemek/≙
yüklemek/≙
yülemek/≙
yülümek/≙
yürümek/≙
yüzlemek/≙
züğürtlemek/≙
çok söylemek/≙
çöplemek/≙
çözgülemek/≙
çözümlemek/≙
çürümek/≙
ödemek/≙
ödünlemek/≙
ödünçlemek/≙
öksemek/≙
ölçülülemek/≙
ölçümlemek/≙
ölçünlemek/≙
önemek/≙
önlemek/≙
öremek/≙
örgülemek/≙
örgütlemek/≙
örklemek/≙
övgülemek/≙
öykülemek/≙
özemek/≙
özgülemek/≙
özlemek/≙
özümlemek/≙
özümsemek/≙
özütlemek/≙
öğürtlemek/≙
öğütlemek/≙
üflemek/≙
ünlemek/≙
üremek/≙
ürümek/≙
üstünlemek/≙
üstünsemek/≙
üstüpülemek/≙
ütülemek/≙
üçlemek/≙
üşümek/≙
